Wisconsin, session 2025, SB951.
do enact as follows:SB951,11Section 1. 15.01 (6) of the statutes is amended to read:SB951,3,4215.01 (6) “Division,” “bureau,” “section,” and “unit” means the subunits of a 3department or an independent agency, whether specifically created by law or 4created by the head of the department or the independent agency for the more 5economic and efficient administration and operation of the programs assigned to 6the department or independent agency. The office of credit unions and the office of 7financial technology innovation in the department of financial institutions, the 8office of the inspector general in the department of children and families, the office 9of the inspector general in the department of health services, and the office of 10children’s mental health in the department of health services have the meaning of 1“division” under this subsection. The office of the long-term care ombudsman 2under the board on aging and long-term care and the office of educational 3accountability and the office of literacy in the department of public instruction have 4the meaning of “bureau” under this subsection.SB951,25Section 2. 15.02 (3) (c) 1. of the statutes is amended to read:SB951,3,13615.02 (3) (c) 1. The principal subunit of the department is the “division”. Each 7division shall be headed by an “administrator”. The office of credit unions and the 8office of financial technology innovation in the department of financial institutions 9and the office of children’s mental health in the department of health services have 10the meaning of “division” and the director of credit unions in the department of 11financial institutions and the director of the office of children’s mental health in the 12department of health services have the meaning of “administrator” under this 13subdivision.SB951,314Section 3. 15.185 (6) of the statutes is created to read:SB951,3,171515.185 (6) Office of financial technology innovation. There is created 16in the department of financial institutions an office of financial technology 17innovation.SB951,418Section 4. 20.005 (3) (schedule) of the statutes: at the appropriate place, 19insert the following amounts for the purposes indicated: - See PDF for table SB951,57Section 5. 20.144 (1) (c) of the statutes is created to read:SB951,4,10820.144 (1) (c) Supporting cryptocurrency in business. As a continuing 9appropriation, the amounts in the schedule for the pilot project under s. 224.886, 10including the award of grants and administration of the pilot project.SB951,611Section 6. 186.235 (7) (b) 1m. of the statutes is amended to read:SB951,4,1712186.235 (7) (b) 1m. Furnish any state regulatory authority regulating state 13financial institutions and the office of financial technology innovation with a copy 14of any examination made by the office of credit unions of any credit union or of any 15report made by the credit union, if the authority or office agrees to treat the 16information received under this subdivision with the same degree of confidentiality 17that is required of employees of the office of credit unions under par. (a).SB951,718Section 7. 220.02 (2) (h) of the statutes is amended to read:SB951,4,2019220.02 (2) (h) Nondepository small business lenders under subch. IV VI of ch. 20224.SB951,821Section 8. 220.06 (1m) of the statutes is amended to read:SB951,5,2322220.06 (1m) No division employee may examine a bank or licensee in which 23that person is interested as a stockholder, officer, or employee. No division 24employee may examine a bank or licensee located in the same village, city, or county 1with any bank or licensee in which that person is so interested. Employees in the 2division, and each member and employee of the banking institutions review board, 3shall keep secret all facts and information obtained in the course of examinations or 4from reports not under s. 221.1002 (1) filed by a bank or licensee with the division, 5except so far as the public duty of the person requires reporting upon or taking 6special action regarding the affairs of any bank or licensee, and except when called 7as a witness in any criminal proceeding or trial in a court of justice. The division 8may furnish to the federal deposit insurance corporation, to a federal home loan 9bank, to any regulatory authority for state or federal financial institutions, 10insurance, or securities, to the office of financial technology innovation, or to any 11organization the membership of which is made up of regulatory authorities for state 12or federal financial institutions, insurance, or securities, a copy of any examination 13made of any such bank or licensee or of any report made by such bank or licensee 14and may give access to and disclose to the corporation, to any regulatory authority 15for state or federal financial institutions, insurance, or securities, to the office of 16financial technology innovation, or to any organization the membership of which is 17made up of regulatory authorities for state or federal financial institutions, 18insurance, or securities, any information possessed by the division, or to a federal 19home loan bank any information created by the division, with reference to the 20conditions or affairs of any such insured bank or licensee if the regulatory authority 21or office agrees to treat all information received with the same degree of 22confidentiality as applies to reports of examination that are in the custody of the 23division.SB951,91Section 9. Subchapter V of chapter 224 [precedes 224.881] of the statutes is 2created to read:SB951,6,33CHAPTER 224SB951,6,54SUBCHAPTER V5FINANCIAL SERVICES INNOVATIONSB951,6,66224.881 Definitions. In this subchapter:SB951,6,97(1) “Innovative financial product” means a financial product or service that 8incorporates new or emerging technology, as applied to the product or service, and 9that is under the department’s regulatory jurisdiction.SB951,6,1110(2) “Office” means the office of financial technology innovation in the 11department.SB951,6,1512224.882 Office duties. (1) (a) The office shall support responsible financial 13innovation in this state. The office shall assist residents of this state in establishing 14or expanding businesses offering innovative financial products by doing all of the 15following:SB951,6,17161. Providing guidance in understanding and navigating the regulatory 17process applicable for the resident’s business.SB951,6,20182. Assisting the resident’s business, to the extent practicable, in securing any 19required license or other approval and in complying with operational requirements 20imposed under the law of this state.SB951,6,23213. Coordinating regulatory activities among different divisions or units of the 22department to streamline the regulatory process and collaborating with other state 23agencies having regulatory authority over the resident’s business.SB951,7,224(b) In performing its functions under par. (a), the office shall also consider any 1risk to the public or consumer protection concern that may be associated with the 2proposed innovative financial product.SB951,7,53(2) The office may conduct research, and publish its findings, related to 4emerging financial technology or innovative financial products to identify 5opportunities and risks associated with the technology or product.SB951,7,86(3) The office may recommend to the secretary of financial institutions 7administrative rule changes that would facilitate or promote the development or 8growth of innovative financial products in this state.SB951,7,109(4) The office shall perform sufficient outreach to inform the public of the 10services provided by the office.SB951,7,1311224.883 Fee waivers. Upon recommendation of the office, the department 12shall grant a waiver of the initial license or approval fee for a business that seeks a 13license or approval to offer an innovative financial product.SB951,7,1614224.886 Pilot project supporting the adoption of cryptocurrency in 15business. (1) The department shall conduct a pilot project that includes all of the 16following:SB951,7,1717(a) Education of the public on cryptocurrency.SB951,7,2018(b) Education and assistance for the state’s business community in 19implementing cryptocurrency as an accepted method of payment for goods and 20services.SB951,7,2221(c) Assistance to the state’s entrepreneurs in establishing or growing 22cryptocurrency-related businesses.SB951,8,223(d) Awarding grants to promote the purposes specified in pars. (a) to (c). The 1department shall promulgate rules related to the award of grants under this 2paragraph.SB951,8,43(2) The grants under sub. (1) (d) and all other activities of the department 4under this section shall be funded from the appropriation under s. 20.144 (1) (c).SB951,8,65(3) The pilot project under this section ends on July 1, 2030. No grant may be 6awarded under sub. (1) (d) after June 30, 2030.SB951,107Section 10. Subchapter IV of chapter 224 [precedes 224.90] of the statutes is 8renumbered subchapter VI of chapter 224 [precedes 224.90].SB951,119Section 11. 551.608 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:SB951,8,2110551.608 (1) Objective of uniformity. The administrator shall, in its 11discretion, cooperate, coordinate, consult, and, subject to s. 551.607, share records 12and information with the securities regulator of another state, Canada, a Canadian 13province or territory, a foreign jurisdiction, the Securities and Exchange 14Commission, the United States Department of Justice, the Commodity Futures 15Trading Commission, the Federal Trade Commission, the Securities Investor 16Protection Corporation, a self-regulatory organization, a national or international 17organization of securities regulators, a federal or state banking or insurance 18regulator, the office of financial technology innovation, and a governmental law 19enforcement agency to effectuate greater uniformity in securities matters among 20the federal government, self-regulatory organizations, states, and foreign 21governments and for the purpose specified in s. 224.882 (1) (a) 3.SB951,1222Section 12. Nonstatutory provisions.SB951,9,223(1) Cryptocurrency pilot project positions. The authorized FTE 24positions for the department of financial institutions are increased by 5.0 GPR 1positions, to be funded from the appropriation under s. 20.144 (1) (c), for the pilot 2project under s. 224.886. Down Down /2025/related/proposals/sb951 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/sb951 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB951 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB951 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»SB951: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting